Louisiana, session 2026, HB287.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1838(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§1838. Fees
The tax commission is hereby authorized on an interim basis for the period
beginning on July 1, 2021 July 1, 2026, and ending on June 30, 2026 June 30, 2030,
to levy and collect the following fees in connection with services performed by the
commission:
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026, if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
the day following such approval by the legislature or July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.